Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1717
Purpose.

The purpose of the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act is to provide the commission alternative methods of contracting for public projects for buildings in the state park system. The alternative methods of contracting shall be available to the commission for use on any project regardless of the funding source. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act shall govern the design-build and construction manager-general contractor procurement process for the commission.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 18.